hunspell/hr_HR/hr_HR.aff
FLAG long
SFX XM Y      21
SFX XM ati    em         ati
SFX XM ati    eš         ati
SFX XM ati    e          ati
SFX XM ati    emo        ati
SFX XM ati    ete        ati
SFX XM ati    u          ati
SFX XM ati    ah         ati
SFX XM ati    aše        ati
SFX XM ati    asmo       ati
SFX XM ati    aste       ati
SFX XM ati    ahu        ati
SFX XM ati    i          ati
SFX XM ati    imo        ati
SFX XM ati    ite        ati
SFX XM ati    ao         ati
SFX XM ati    ala        ati
SFX XM ati    alo        ati
SFX XM ati    ali        ati
SFX XM ati    ale        ati
SFX XM ati    ući        ati
SFX XM ati    at         ati

SFX XL Y      21
SFX XL uti    em         uti
SFX XL uti    eš         uti
SFX XL uti    e          uti
SFX XL uti    emo        uti
SFX XL uti    ete        uti
SFX XL uti    u          uti
SFX XL uti    jah        uti
SFX XL uti    jaše       uti
SFX XL uti    jasmo      uti
SFX XL uti    jaste      uti
SFX XL uti    jahu       uti
SFX XL uti    i          uti
SFX XL uti    imo        uti
SFX XL uti    ite        uti
SFX XL uti    uo         uti
SFX XL uti    ula        uti
SFX XL uti    ulo        uti
SFX XL uti    uli        uti
SFX XL uti    ule        uti
SFX XL uti    ući        uti
SFX XL uti    ut         uti

SFX XK Y      18
SFX XK ati    im         ati
SFX XK ati    iš         ati
SFX XK ati    i          ati
SFX XK ati    imo        ati
SFX XK ati    ite        ati
SFX XK ati    e          ati
SFX XK ati    ah         ati
SFX XK ati    aše        ati
SFX XK ati    asmo       ati
SFX XK ati    aste       ati
SFX XK ati    ahu        ati
SFX XK ati    ao         ati
SFX XK ati    ala        ati
SFX XK ati    alo        ati
SFX XK ati    ali        ati
SFX XK ati    ale        ati
SFX XK ati    eći        ati
SFX XK ati    at         ati

SFX XJ Y      12
SFX XJ iti    jeti       iti
SFX XJ iti    jeh        iti
SFX XJ iti    je         iti
SFX XJ iti    jesmo      iti
SFX XJ iti    jeste      iti
SFX XJ iti    ješe       iti
SFX XJ iti    jevši      iti
SFX XJ iti    jela       iti
SFX XJ iti    jelo       iti
SFX XJ iti    jeli       iti
SFX XJ iti    jele       iti
SFX XJ iti    jet        iti

SFX XI Y      10
SFX XI ati    ljem       ati
SFX XI ati    lješ       ati
SFX XI ati    lje        ati
SFX XI ati    ljemo      ati
SFX XI ati    ljete      ati
SFX XI ati    lju        ati
SFX XI ati    lji        ati
SFX XI ati    ljimo      ati
SFX XI ati    ljite      ati
SFX XI ati    ljući      ati

SFX XH Y      3
SFX XH jati   j          jati
SFX XH jati   jmo        jati
SFX XH jati   jte        jati

SFX XG Y      1
SFX XG ti     vši        ti

SFX XF Y      5
SFX XF iti    ah         iti
SFX XF iti    aše        iti
SFX XF iti    asmo       iti
SFX XF iti    aste       iti
SFX XF iti    ahu        iti

SFX XE Y      5
SFX XE iti    jah        iti
SFX XE iti    jaše       iti
SFX XE iti    jasmo      iti
SFX XE iti    jaste      iti
SFX XE iti    jahu       iti

SFX XD Y      5
SFX XD iti    ljah       iti
SFX XD iti    ljaše      iti
SFX XD iti    ljasmo     iti
SFX XD iti    ljaste     iti
SFX XD iti    ljahu      iti

SFX XC Y      45
SFX XC diti   đah        diti
SFX XC diti   đaše       diti
SFX XC diti   đasmo      diti
SFX XC diti   đaste      diti
SFX XC diti   đahu       diti
SFX XC siti   šah        siti
SFX XC siti   šaše       siti
SFX XC siti   šasmo      siti
SFX XC siti   šaste      siti
SFX XC siti   šahu       siti
SFX XC titi   ćah        titi
SFX XC titi   ćaše       titi
SFX XC titi   ćasmo      titi
SFX XC titi   ćaste      titi
SFX XC titi   ćahu       titi
SFX XC ziti   žah        ziti
SFX XC ziti   žaše       ziti
SFX XC ziti   žasmo      ziti
SFX XC ziti   žaste      ziti
SFX XC ziti   žahu       ziti
SFX XC djeti  đah        djeti
SFX XC djeti  đaše       djeti
SFX XC djeti  đasmo      djeti
SFX XC djeti  đaste      djeti
SFX XC djeti  đahu       djeti
SFX XC tjeti  ćah        tjeti
SFX XC tjeti  ćaše       tjeti
SFX XC tjeti  ćasmo      tjeti
SFX XC tjeti  ćaste      tjeti
SFX XC tjeti  ćahu       tjeti
SFX XC njeti  njah       njeti
SFX XC njeti  njaše      njeti
SFX XC njeti  njasmo     njeti
SFX XC njeti  njaste     njeti
SFX XC njeti  njahu      njeti
SFX XC ljeti  ljah       ljeti
SFX XC ljeti  ljaše      ljeti
SFX XC ljeti  ljasmo     ljeti
SFX XC ljeti  ljaste     ljeti
SFX XC ljeti  ljahu      ljeti
SFX XC vjeti  vljah      vjeti
SFX XC vjeti  vljaše     vjeti
SFX XC vjeti  vljasmo    vjeti
SFX XC vjeti  vljaste    vjeti
SFX XC vjeti  vljahu     vjeti

SFX XB Y      30
SFX XB stiti  šćah       stiti
SFX XB stiti  šćaše      stiti
SFX XB stiti  šćasmo     stiti
SFX XB stiti  šćaste     stiti
SFX XB stiti  šćahu      stiti
SFX XB sniti  šnjah      sniti
SFX XB sniti  šnjaše     sniti
SFX XB sniti  šnjasmo    sniti
SFX XB sniti  šnjaste    sniti
SFX XB sniti  šnjahu     sniti
SFX XB zniti  žnjah      zniti
SFX XB zniti  žnjaše     zniti
SFX XB zniti  žnjasmo    zniti
SFX XB zniti  žnjaste    zniti
SFX XB zniti  žnjahu     zniti
SFX XB zditi  žđah       zditi
SFX XB zditi  žđaše      zditi
SFX XB zditi  žđasmo     zditi
SFX XB zditi  žđaste     zditi
SFX XB zditi  žđahu      zditi
SFX XB djeti  đijah      djeti
SFX XB djeti  đijaše     djeti
SFX XB djeti  đijasmo    djeti
SFX XB djeti  đijaste    djeti
SFX XB djeti  đijahu     djeti
SFX XB rjeti  rah        rjeti
SFX XB rjeti  raše       rjeti
SFX XB rjeti  rasmo      rjeti
SFX XB rjeti  raste      rjeti
SFX XB rjeti  rahu       rjeti

SFX XA Y      11
SFX XA ati    adem       ati
SFX XA ati    adeš       ati
SFX XA ati    ade        ati
SFX XA ati    ademo      ati
SFX XA ati    adete      ati
SFX XA ati    adu        ati
SFX XA ati    adijah     ati
SFX XA ati    adijaše    ati
SFX XA ati    adijasmo   ati
SFX XA ati    adijaste   ati
SFX XA ati    adijahu    ati

SFX WZ Y      21
SFX WZ ati    am         ati
SFX WZ ati    aš         ati
SFX WZ ati    a          ati
SFX WZ ati    amo        ati
SFX WZ ati    ate        ati
SFX WZ ati    aju        ati
SFX WZ ati    ah         ati
SFX WZ ati    aše        ati
SFX WZ ati    asmo       ati
SFX WZ ati    aste       ati
SFX WZ ati    ahu        ati
SFX WZ ati    aj         ati
SFX WZ ati    ajmo       ati
SFX WZ ati    ajte       ati
SFX WZ ati    ao         ati
SFX WZ ati    ala        ati
SFX WZ ati    alo        ati
SFX WZ ati    ali        ati
SFX WZ ati    ale        ati
SFX WZ ati    avši       ati
SFX WZ ati    at         ati

SFX WY Y      48
SFX WY ovati  ujem       ovati
SFX WY ovati  uješ       ovati
SFX WY ovati  uje        ovati
SFX WY ovati  ujemo      ovati
SFX WY ovati  ujete      ovati
SFX WY ovati  uju        ovati
SFX WY evati  ujem       evati
SFX WY evati  uješ       evati
SFX WY evati  uje        evati
SFX WY evati  ujemo      evati
SFX WY evati  ujete      evati
SFX WY evati  uju        evati
SFX WY uvati  ujem       uvati
SFX WY uvati  uješ       uvati
SFX WY uvati  uje        uvati
SFX WY uvati  ujemo      uvati
SFX WY uvati  ujete      uvati
SFX WY uvati  uju        uvati
SFX WY rati   rem        rati
SFX WY rati   reš        rati
SFX WY rati   re         rati
SFX WY rati   remo       rati
SFX WY rati   rete       rati
SFX WY rati   ru         rati
SFX WY ati    ah         ati
SFX WY ati    a          ati
SFX WY ati    asmo       ati
SFX WY ati    aste       ati
SFX WY ati    aše        ati
SFX WY ovati  uj         ovati
SFX WY ovati  ujmo       ovati
SFX WY ovati  ujte       ovati
SFX WY evati  uj         evati
SFX WY evati  ujmo       evati
SFX WY evati  ujte       evati
SFX WY uvati  uj         uvati
SFX WY uvati  ujmo       uvati
SFX WY uvati  ujte       uvati
SFX WY rati   ri         rati
SFX WY rati   rimo       rati
SFX WY rati   rite       rati
SFX WY ati    ao         ati
SFX WY ati    ala        ati
SFX WY ati    alo        ati
SFX WY ati    ali        ati
SFX WY ati    ale        ati
SFX WY ati    avši       ati
SFX WY ati    at         ati

AF XZXIURUD	# 20
AF XZXIURUC	# 21
AF XZXGURUD	# 24
AF XZXGURUC	# 25
AF XZXGUD	# 26
AF XZXAURUD	# 27
AF XYXGURUD	# 43
AF XXXG	# 51
AF XXXF	# 52
AF XXXE	# 56
AF XXXEXJ	# 57
AF XXXD	# 58
AF XXXDXG	# 60
AF XXXC	# 62
AF XXXCXJ	# 63
AF XXXB	# 64
AF XM	# 93
AF XMUR	# 94
AF XMURUD	# 95
AF XMURUC	# 96
AF XL	# 98
AF XKXHUR	# 100
AF XKUR	# 101
AF XKURUD	# 102
AF XKURUC	# 103
AF WZ	# 105
AF WZXI	# 107
AF WZURUD	# 114
AF WZURUC	# 115
AF WZUD	# 119
AF WZUC	# 120
AF WY	# 121
AF WYUD	# 126
AF WYUC	# 127
AF WXXJ	# 129
