hunspell/hr_HR/hr_HR.dic
bagerirati/25
blejati/101
bojiti/52
braviti/58
brečati/101
brinuti/98
brstiti/64
brusiti/62
budaliti/56
bulazniti/64
cakliti/58
cičati/101
cijeliti/57
crnčiti/52
cviliti/57
častiti/64
čepiti/58
čistiti/64
dimiti/58
dogoniti/56
doimati/21
domiliti/129
dovoziti/62
dozivati/21
drečati/101
dubiti/60
duljiti/52
ginuti/98
gnjeviti/58
goropaditi/62
govoriti/52
guliti/56
gustiti/64
hladiti/62
hodočastiti/64
huktati/101
huliti/56
imenovati/43
iskušati/120
ispirati/96
ispoštovati/126
izanalizirati/120
izazivati/21
izbljuvati/127
izgoriti/129
izvirati/94
izvježbati/119
jagmiti/58
jamčiti/52
jezditi/64
kaliti/56
kliziti/62
konstatirati/25
koristiti/64
koriti/52
krčati/101
kreirati/24
krpiti/58
krstiti/64
kruniti/56
kućiti/52
lemiti/58
ležati/101
luditi/63
mastiti/64
mesariti/52
mimoilaziti/62
mlitaviti/58
moliti/56
načinjati/96
nadglasovati/121
nadimati/20
najebati/93
nakupovati/127
naravnati/115
nastojati/100
navirati/96
navoditi/62
obirati/94
oblikovati/43
oboliti/129
obrojčati/101
obuzimati/21
odgledati/120
odugovlačiti/51
oholiti/56
okoriti/129
okovati/126
opirati/94
opravdati/114
organizirati/24
ostariti/129
othramati/107
otputovati/121
pakostiti/64
pjeskariti/52
poblijediti/129
podastirati/96
podati/26
podrpati/119
pokupovati/127
polaziti/62
poplaviti/129
posavjetovati/127
postojati/102
postradati/120
pozeleniti/129
predati/24
prekovati/126
preotimati/21
prepirati/94
pretjerati/114
pričinjati/25
prilaziti/62
prisipati/21
prokapati/25
prokljuvati/121
prokunjati/105
prolebditi/129
propinjati/96
prosipati/21
prostiti/64
protiviti/58
pršiti/52
prštati/101
putiti/62
raskovati/127
raspremati/20
razdirati/95
razgledati/25
ručati/25
saletiti/129
seliti/56
sjediti/62
skovati/126
skrbiti/58
smalaksati/105
sokolariti/52
stršati/101
šareniti/56
škopiti/58
škripati/101
štipati/21
štititi/62
tamniti/57
tanjiti/52
tapšati/96
trapiti/58
trčati/103
trijezniti/64
uvirati/96
uzimati/21
uziti/62
užurbati/119
vlažiti/52
zaboliti/129
zaletiti/129
zastirati/96
zatalasati/119
zauzimati/21
zavrbovati/127
znati/27
zobati/21
zrcaliti/56
zvečati/101
